Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1202
Expenses chargeable
to political subdivisions.

The cost of publication
and posting of notices and ballots, the cost of precinct registration lists,
the compensation of temporary employees, inspectors, judges and clerks of
election, and members of counting boards, the
overtime costs of all permanent employees of the election commissioner or
county clerk relating to elections, the cost of renting, heating,
lighting, and equipping polling places including placing and removing ballot
boxes and other fixtures and equipment, the cost of printing and delivering
ballots and sample ballots, the cost of postage, cards of instructions for
voters, maps, voter books for the polling place, other election supplies,
and electronic media, the expense of programming and operation of voting systems,
and all other expenses of conducting statewide primary and general elections
not listed in section 32-1201 shall be chargeable to the political subdivisions
in and for which such elections are held.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 367;

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 42;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 20.

A county is liable for the expense of reprinting correct ballots where a mistake is discovered in ballots which have already been printed and paid for by the county. Wahlquist v. Adams County, 94 Neb. 682, 144 N.W. 171 (1913).